Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Preserving
Oklahoma Values Act of 2026”.
B. It is the intent of the Legislature that it shall be the
policy of this state to protect its citizens from the application of
laws that are contrary to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Constitution, the United States Constitution, or the shared values
of Judeo-Christian Western civilization.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2010 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Court” means any court, board, tribunal, administrative
agency, or other adjudicative or enforcement authority of this state
or any of its political subdivisions;
2. “Foreign law, legal code, or system” means any law, legal
code, or system of a jurisdiction outside of any state or territory
of the United States, inclusive of the laws, legal codes, and
systems of international organizations or tribunals, applied by that
jurisdiction’s courts, administrative bodies, or other formal or
informal tribunals that are contrary to Western values. This shall
not be construed as applying to the laws of any Native American
tribes within this state;
3. “Religious organization” means a church, seminary,
synagogue, temple, mosque, religious order, religious corporation,
association, or society with an identity that is distinctive in
terms of a common religious creed, beliefs, doctrines, practices, or
rituals of any faith or denomination, including any organization
qualifying as a church or religious organization under the
provisions of 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) or 26 U.S.C., Section
501(d); and
4. “Judeo-Christian Western rights and values” means a system
of values which recognizes:
a. the right to due process,
b. the right to equal protection under the law,
c. freedom of religion,
d. freedom of speech,
e. freedom of the press,
f. the right to keep and bear arms,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1679 Page 2

g. the right to privacy, and
h. the right to marry, as “marriage” is defined by the
Oklahoma Constitution, to the extent that such
definition does not conflict with federal law or a
holding by the United States Supreme Court.
B. Any court ruling or decision, if such ruling or decision is
based in whole or in part on any foreign law, legal code, or system,
shall be void and unenforceable if such ruling violates any Judeo-
Christian Western rights and values.
C. Any contract or contractual provision, if such would allow
for a foreign law, legal code, or system to govern all or some of
the disputes arising between the parties adjudicated by a court or
law or by an arbitration panel arising from the mutually agreed
contract, shall be void and unenforceable if such foreign law, legal
code, or system does not grant the parties any Judeo-Christian
Western rights and values.
D. Any contract or contractual provision, if such provides for
a jurisdiction for purposes of granting the courts or arbitration
panels personal jurisdiction over the parties to adjudicate any
disputes between parties arising from the mutually agreed contract,
shall be void and unenforceable if such jurisdiction would apply any
foreign law, legal code, or system to the dispute at issue that is
contrary to any Judeo-Christian Western rights and values.
E. This section shall not apply to a corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, business association, or other legal
entity that contracts to subject itself to a foreign law, legal
code, or system.
F. 1. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
limit the right of any person in this state to the free exercise of
religion as guaranteed by the provisions of the Oklahoma
Constitution and the First Amendment to the United States
Constitution.
2. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
require or authorize a court to adjudicate or prohibit any religious
ENR. S. B. NO. 1679 Page 3

organization from adjudicating ecclesiastical matters, including but
not limited to the election, appointment, calling, discipline,
dismissal, removal, or excommunication of a member, officer,
official, priest, nun, monk, pastor, rabbi, imam, or member of the
clergy of such organization, or the determination or interpretation
of the doctrine of such organization if such adjudication would
violate the provisions of the Oklahoma Constitution and the First
Amendment to the United States Constitution.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1679 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1679 Page 5